New York, session 2025-2026, A4624.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, as amended by chapter 244 of the laws of 2013, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (a) [he or she] such person is not less than twenty years of age as of 5 the date of appointment [nor more than thirty-five years of age as of 6 the date when the applicant takes the written examination, provided that 7 the maximum age requirement of thirty-five years of age as set forth in 8 this paragraph shall not apply to eligible lists finalized pursuant to 9 an examination administered prior to May thirty-first, nineteen hundred 10 ninety-nine or a police officer in the department of environmental 11 conservation, provided, however, that: 12 (i) time spent on military duty or on terminal leave, not exceeding a 13 total of six years, shall be subtracted from the age of any applicant 14 who has passed his or her thirty-fifth birthday as provided in subdivi- 15 sion ten-a of section two hundred forty-three of the military law; 16 (ii) such maximum age requirement of thirty-five years shall not apply 17 to any police officer as defined in subdivision thirty-four of section 18 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, who was continuously employed by the 19 Buffalo municipal housing authority between January first, two thousand 20 five and June thirtieth, two thousand five and who takes the next writ- 21 ten exam offered after the effective date of this subparagraph by the 22 city of Buffalo civil service commission for employment as a police 23 officer in the city of Buffalo police department, or June thirtieth, two 24 thousand six, whichever is later; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04483-01-5 A. 4624 2 1 (iii) such maximum age requirement of thirty-five years shall not 2 apply to any police officer of any county, town, city or village police 3 force not otherwise provided for in this section if the eligible list 4 has been exhausted and there are no other eligible candidates; provided, 5 however, the police officer themselves are on the eligible list of such 6 county, town, city or village and meet all other requirements of merit 7 and fitness set forth by this chapter and do not exceed the maximum age 8 of thirty-nine]; 9 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 58 of the civil service law, as amended 10 by chapter 244 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 11 2. The provisions of this section shall not prevent any county, city, 12 town, village, housing authority, transit authority, police district or 13 the department of environmental conservation from setting more restric- 14 tive requirements of eligibility for its police officers[, except the 15 maximum age to be a police officer as provided in paragraph (a) of 16 subdivision one of this section]. 17 § 3. Subdivision 4 of section 58 of the civil service law, as sepa- 18 rately amended by chapters 375 and 397 of the laws of 1990, paragraphs 19 (a) and (b) as amended by chapter 561 of the laws of 2015, paragraph (c) 20 as amended by chapter 190 of the laws of 2008 and subparagraphs (ii) and 21 (iv) of paragraph (c) as amended by section 58 of subpart B of part C of 22 chapter 62 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 23 4. (a) [Any person who has received provisional or permanent appoint- 24 ment in the competitive class of the civil service as a police officer 25 of the regional state park police, the state university of New York 26 police, the department of environmental conservation or any police force 27 or police department of any county, city, town, village, housing author- 28 ity, transit authority or police district shall be eligible to resign 29 from any police force or police department, and to be appointed as a 30 police officer in the same or any other police force or police depart- 31 ment without satisfying the age requirements set forth in paragraph (a) 32 of subdivision one of this section at the time of such second or subse- 33 quent appointment, provided such second or subsequent appointment occurs 34 within thirty days of the date of resignation. 35 (b) Any person who has received permanent appointment in the compet- 36 itive class of the civil service as a police officer of the regional 37 state park police, the state university of New York police, the depart- 38 ment of environmental conservation or any police force or police depart- 39 ment of any county, city, town, village, housing authority, transit 40 authority or police district shall be eligible to resign from any police 41 force or police department and, subject to such civil service rules as 42 may be applicable, shall be eligible for reinstatement in the same 43 police force or police department or in any other police force or police 44 department to which he or she was eligible for transfer, without satis- 45 fying the age requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of subdivision one 46 of this section at the time of such reinstatement, provided such rein- 47 statement occurs within one year of the date of resignation. 48 (c) (i)] Legislative findings and declaration. The legislature hereby 49 finds and declares that it is frequently impracticable to ascertain 50 fitness for the positions of detective and investigator within various 51 police or sheriffs departments around the state by means of a compet- 52 itive examination due to the unique nature of the duties assigned and 53 the intangible personal qualities needed to perform such duties. The 54 legislature further finds that competitive examination has never been 55 employed in many police, correction or sheriffs departments, to ascer- 56 tain fitness for the positions of detective and investigator within such A. 4624 3 1 police, correction or sheriffs departments; such fitness has always been 2 determined by evaluation of the capabilities of an individual (who has 3 in any case received permanent appointment to the position of police 4 officer, correction officer of any rank or deputy sheriff) by superviso- 5 ry personnel. The legislature further finds that an individual who 6 performs in an investigatory position in a manner sufficiently satisfac- 7 tory to the appropriate supervisors to hold such an assignment for a 8 period of eighteen months, has demonstrated fitness for the position of 9 detective or investigator within such police, correction or sheriffs 10 department at least as sufficiently as could be ascertained by means of 11 a competitive examination. 12 [(ii)] (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any juris- 13 diction, other than a city with a population of one million or more or 14 the state department of corrections and community supervision, which 15 does not administer examinations for designation to detective or inves- 16 tigator, any person who has received permanent appointment to the posi- 17 tion of police officer, correction officer of any rank or deputy sheriff 18 and is temporarily assigned to perform the duties of detective or inves- 19 tigator shall, whenever such assignment to the duties of a detective or 20 investigator exceeds eighteen months, be permanently designated as a 21 detective or investigator and receive the compensation ordinarily paid 22 to persons in such designation. 23 [(iii)] (c) Nothing contained in [subparagraph (ii)] paragraph (b) of 24 this [paragraph] subdivision shall be construed to limit any jurisdic- 25 tion's ability to administer examinations for appointment to the posi- 26 tions of detective and investigator, provided however that any person 27 temporarily assigned to perform the duties of detective or investigator 28 within the period commencing September twenty-third, nineteen hundred 29 ninety-three through and including the date upon which this paragraph 30 shall have become a law and who has not been designated as a detective 31 or investigator and who has not been subject to an examination for which 32 there is a certified eligible list, shall be permanently designated as a 33 detective or investigator whenever such assignment to the duties of 34 detective or investigator exceeds eighteen months. 35 [(iv)] (d) Detectives and investigators designated since September 36 twenty-third, nineteen hundred ninety and prior to February twenty- 37 fourth, nineteen hundred ninety-five by any state, county, town, village 38 or city (other than a city with a population of one million or more or 39 the state department of corrections and community supervision) police, 40 correction or sheriffs department, pursuant to the provisions of this 41 paragraph in effect during such period, who continue to serve in such 42 positions, shall retain their detective or investigator status without 43 any right to retroactive financial entitlement. 44 § 4. Subdivision 3 of section 215 of the executive law, as amended by 45 chapter 478 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as follows: 46 3. The sworn members of the New York state police shall be appointed 47 by the superintendent and permanent appointees may be removed by the 48 superintendent only after a hearing. No person shall be appointed to the 49 New York state police force as a sworn member unless [he or she] such 50 person shall be a citizen of the United States, [between the ages of] 51 and at least twenty-one [and twenty-nine years except that in the super- 52 intendent's discretion, the maximum age may be extended to thirty-five 53 years. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any general or 54 special law to the contrary the time spent on military duty, not exceed- 55 ing a total of six years, shall be subtracted from the age of any appli- 56 cant who has passed his or her twenty-ninth birthday, solely for the A. 4624 4 1 purpose of permitting qualification as to age and for no other purpose. 2 Such limitations as to age however shall not apply to persons appointed 3 to the positions of counsel, first assistant counsel, assistant counsel, 4 and assistant deputy superintendent for employee relations nor to any 5 person appointed to the bureau of criminal investigation pursuant to 6 section two hundred sixteen of this article nor] years of age. Nor shall 7 any person be appointed unless [he or she] such person has fitness and 8 good moral character and shall have passed a physical and mental exam- 9 ination based upon standards provided by the rules and regulations of 10 the superintendent. Appointments shall be made for a probationary period 11 which, in the case of appointees required to attend and complete a basic 12 training program at the state police academy, shall include such time 13 spent attending the basic school and terminate one year after successful 14 completion thereof. All other sworn members shall be subject to a proba- 15 tionary period of one year from the date of appointment. Following 16 satisfactory completion of the probationary period the member shall be a 17 permanent appointee. Voluntary resignation or withdrawal from the New 18 York state police during such appointment shall be submitted to the 19 superintendent for approval. Reasonable time shall be required to 20 account for all equipment issued or for debts or obligations to the 21 state to be satisfied. Resignation or withdrawal from the division 22 during a time of emergency, so declared by the governor, shall not be 23 approved if contrary to the best interest of the state and shall be a 24 misdemeanor. No sworn member removed from the New York state police 25 shall be eligible for reappointment. The superintendent shall make rules 26 and regulations subject to approval by the governor for the discipline 27 and control of the New York state police and for the examination and 28 qualifications of applicants for appointment as members thereto and such 29 examinations shall be held and conducted by the superintendent subject 30 to such rules and regulations. The superintendent is authorized to 31 charge a fee of twenty dollars as an application fee for any person 32 applying to take a competitive examination for the position of trooper, 33 and a fee of five dollars for any competitive examination for a civilian 34 position. The superintendent shall promulgate regulations subject to the 35 approval of the director of the budget, to provide for a waiver of the 36 application fee when the fee would cause an unreasonable hardship on the 37 applicant and to establish a fee schedule and charge fees for the use of 38 state police facilities. 39 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.